Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-362
Warrants; laws governing county warrants applicable.

The law of this state under which county warrants are issued, sold, transferred, assigned, presented for payment and paid, shall apply to all warrants issued by virtue of the provisions of sections 31-301 to 31-369.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 30, p. 632;

R.S.1913, § 1857;

C.S.1922, § 1804;

C.S.1929, § 31-461;

R.S.1943, § 31-362.